test/src/morphology/N-pii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - pii: # nouns '(eng) flint / (fin) pii' 
    pii+N+Sg+Nom: pii
    pii+N+Sg+Gen: piin
    pii+N+Sg+Ill: piih
    pii+N+Sg+Ine: piis
    pii+N+Sg+Par: piidy

    puu+N+Sg+Nom: puu
    puu+N+Sg+Gen: puun
    puu+N+Sg+Ill: puuh
    puu+N+Sg+Ine: puus
    puu+N+Sg+Par: puudu

    pyy+N+Sg+Nom: pyy
    pyy+N+Sg+Gen: pyyn
    pyy+N+Sg+Ill: pyyh
    pyy+N+Sg+Ine: pyys
    pyy+N+Sg+Par: pyydy

    kaheksa+Num+Sg+Nom: kaheksa
    kaheksa+Num+Sg+Gen: kaheksan
    kaheksa+Num+Sg+Ill: kaheksah
    kaheksa+Num+Sg+Ine: kaheksas
    kaheksa+Num+Sg+Par: kaheksua

    yheksä+Num+Sg+Nom: yheksä
    yheksä+Num+Sg+Gen: yheksän
    yheksä+Num+Sg+Ill: yheksäh
    yheksä+Num+Sg+Ine: yheksäs
    yheksä+Num+Sg+Par: yheksiä

    nelli+Num+Sg+Nom: nelli
    nelli+Num+Sg+Gen: nellän
    nelli+Num+Sg+Ill: nelläh
    nelli+Num+Sg+Ine: nelläs
    nelli+Num+Sg+Par: nelliä
